Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1527
Records.

(1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall keep and maintain in the licensee's office or place of business the following records:

(a) Results of tests and other records as they pertain to hearing assessments conducted by the licensed hearing instrument specialist and the dispensing of hearing instruments by the licensed hearing instrument specialist;

(b) A copy of the written contract and, if executed, signed medical evaluation waiver; and

(c) Copies of such other records as the department, with the recommendation of the board, reasonably requires.

(2) Any such record shall be kept and maintained by the licensed hearing instrument specialist for a period of seven years after the date the record was produced.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 31.